it: Sistema Fagotto: Francese (Buffet); Tedesco (Heckel); Ibrido; Altro
tr: Fagot sistemi: Fransız (Buffet); Alman (Heckel); Hibrit; Diğer
es: Sistema del fagot: Francés (Buffet); Alemán (Heckel); Híbrido; Otro
vi: Hệ thống kèn bassoon: Hệ Pháp (Buffet); Hệ Đức (Heckel); Lai; Khác
sl-SI: Sistem fagota: Francoski (Buffet); Nemški (Heckel); Hibridni; Drugo
ja: ファゴットシステム: フランス式 (ビュッフェ); ドイツ式 (ヘッケル); ハイブリッド; その他
en: Bassoon system: French (Buffet); German (Heckel); Hybrid; Other
ru: Система клапанов фагота: Французская (Buffet); Немецкая (Heckel); Гибридная; Другая
zh-TW: 低音管系統: 法式 (Buffet); 德式 (Heckel); 混合式; 其他
th: ระบบบาสซูน: ฝรั่งเศส (Buffet); เยอรมัน (Heckel); ไฮบริด; อื่นๆ
nl: Fagot systeem: Frans (Buffet); Duits (Heckel); Hybride; Overig
zh-CN: 巴松管系统: 法式 (Buffet); 德式 (Heckel); 混合; 其他
pt-PT: Sistema de fagote: Francês (Buffet); Alemão (Heckel); Híbrido; Outro
hr-HR: Sustav fagota: Francuski (Buffet); Njemački (Heckel); Hibridni; Ostalo
bg-BG: Фаготна система: Френска (Buffet); Немска (Heckel); Хибридна; Друго
cs: Prstokladový systém fagotu: Francouzský (Buffet); Německý (Heckel); Hybridní; Jiné
sv: Fagottsystem: Franskt (Buffet); Tyskt (Heckel); Hybrid; Övrigt
ko: 바순 시스템: 프랑스식(뷔페); 독일식(헤켈); 하이브리드; 기타
ro-RO: Sistem de fagot: Francez (Buffet); German (Heckel); Hibrid; Altele
nb: Fagottsystem: Fransk (Buffet); Tysk (Heckel); Hybrid; Annet
lt-LT: Fagoto sistema: Prancūziška („Buffet“); Vokiška („Heckel“); Hibridinė; Kita
sk-SK: Systém fagotu: Francúzsky (Buffet); Nemecký (Heckel); Hybridný; Iné
da: Fagottsystem: Fransk (Buffet); Tysk (Heckel); Hybrid; Andet
fi: Fagottijärjestelmä: Ranskalainen (Buffet); Saksalainen (Heckel); Hybridi; Muu
pt-BR: Sistema do fagote: Francês (Buffet); Alemão (Heckel); Híbrido; Outro
pl: System fagotu: Francuski (Buffet); Niemiecki (Heckel); Hybrydowy; Inne
de: Fagottsystem: Französisch (Buffet); Deutsch (Heckel); Hybrid; Sonstige
hu: Fagottrendszer: Francia (Buffet); Német (Heckel); Hibrid; Egyéb
fr: Système de basson: Français (Buffet); Allemand (Heckel); Hybride; Autre
el: Σύστημα φαγκότου: Γαλλικό (Buffet); Γερμανικό (Heckel); Υβριδικό; Άλλο